test/src/dict-gt-yamls/N-sual_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - suâl a-stem saari: # Noun - full paradigm
     suâl+N+Sg+Nom+Indef: suâl
     suâl+N+Sg+Gen+Indef: suõlˈlu
     suâl+N+Sg+Acc+Indef: suõlˈlu
     suâl+N+Sg+Ill+Indef: [suâlˈlǥa, suâlˈlʼja]
     suâl+N+Sg+Loc+Indef: [suõlˈlust, suâlˈlʼjest]
     suâl+N+Sg+Com+Indef: [suõlˈluin, suâlˈlʼjin]
     suâl+N+Ess+Indef: suâlan
     suâl+N+Par+Indef: suõlˈlud
     suâl+N+Sg+Abe+Indef: [suõlˈlutaa, suõlˈlutää]
     suâl+N+Pl+Nom+Indef: suõlˈlu
     suâl+N+Pl+Gen+Indef: suõlˈlui
     suâl+N+Pl+Acc+Indef: suõlˈluid
     suâl+N+Pl+Ill+Indef: suõlˈluid
     suâl+N+Pl+Loc+Indef: suõlˈluin
     suâl+N+Pl+Com+Indef: suõlˈluivuiʹm
     suâl+N+Pl+Abe+Indef: [suõlˈluitaa, suõlˈluitää]
